Maryland, session 2026, SB0510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0510*

SENATE BILL 510
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Morticians and Funeral Directors.
7–303.
(a) (1) The Board shall determine the qualifications necessary for an
individual to lawfully engage in the practice of mortuary science or funeral direction and
to operate a funeral establishment within this State.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, to qualify for a mortician
or funeral director license, an applicant shall be an individual who meets the requirements
of this section.
(b) The Board shall examine all applications for licensure for the practice of
mortuary science or funeral direction and shall issue the mortician or funeral director
license to an individual who:
(1) Is judged to be of good moral character;
(2) Has completed not less than 1 year and not more than 4 years of
licensed apprenticeship, unless the Board allowed extensions for additional 1–year terms;
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section[, has graduated]:
(I) FOR AN INDIVIDUAL APPLYING FOR A LICENSE TO
PRACTICE AS A MORTICIAN, HAS:
1. A. GRADUATED with an associate of arts degree in
mortuary science or its equivalent from a school accredited by the American Board of
Funeral Service Education or approved by the Board[,]; or [has acquired]
B. ACQUIRED at least an associate of arts degree and
completed a course in mortuary science that is accredited by the American Board of Funeral
Service Education or approved by the Board; AND
[(4)] 2. [For an individual applying for a license to practice as a
mortician, passed] PASSED the national board examination administered by the
Conference of Funeral Service Examining Boards of the United States; OR
(II) 1. FOR AN INDIVIDUAL APPLYING FOR A LICENSE TO
PRACTICE AS A FUNERAL DIRECTOR, HAS:
A. GRADUATED WITH AN ASSOCIATE OF ARTS DEGREE IN
MORTUARY SCIENCE OR ITS EQUIVALENT FROM A SCHOOL ACCREDITED BY THE
AMERICAN BOARD OF FUNERAL SERVICE EDUCATION; OR

SENATE BILL 510 3
B. SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
ACQUIRED AT LEAST AN ASSOCIATE OF ARTS DEGREE AND COMPLETED A COURSE IN
MORTUARY SCIENCE THAT IS ACCREDITED BY THE AMERICAN BOARD OF FUNERAL
SERVICE EDUCATION; AND
[(5)] 2. [For an individual applying for a license to practice as a
funeral director, passed the arts and sciences State board examinations,] PASSED THE
NATIONAL BOARD EXAMINATION administered by the Conference of Funeral Service
Examining Boards of the United States;
[(6)] (4) Except as provided in subsection [(c)] (D) of this section, has
passed a written examination on Maryland law and regulations governing the practice of
mortuary science and a practical examination demonstrating competency in the
preparation of dead human bodies for final disposition and sanitary science; and
[(7)] (5) Has submitted an application to the Board on the required form
and has paid a fee set by the Board.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN ASSOCIATE
OF ARTS DEGREE UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(3)(II)1B OF THIS SECTION MUST INCLUDE
A MINIMUM OF 60 CREDIT HOURS OR THE EQUIVALENT OF CREDIT HOURS IN
COURSES RELEVANT TO THE PRACTICE OF A FUNERAL DIRECTOR; AND
(2) A MINIMUM OF 30 CREDIT HOURS OF THE HOURS REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MUST BE IN A PROGRAM APPROVED BY
THE BOARD.
[(c)] (D) For an individual applying for a license to practice funeral direction,
the practical examination qualification under subsection [(b)(6)] (B)(4) of this section may
not include [demonstrating]:
(1) A PRACTICAL EXAMINATION DEMONSTRATING COMPETENCY IN
THE PREPARATION OF DEAD HUMAN BODIES FOR FINAL DISPOSITION AND SANITARY
SCIENCE; OR
(2) DEMONSTRATING competency in embalming.
[(d)] (E) The Board shall advise each applicant that a license issued under
subsection (b) of this section does not guarantee that the applicant will be allowed to
practice in any other state.
7–306.
(d) (1) (i) Before an individual appears before the Board for approval of an
apprentice license:

SENATE BILL 510
1. TO ASSIST A LICENSED MORTICIAN IN THE PRACTICE
OF MORTUARY SCIENCE, the individual shall be enrolled in or have graduated from a
mortuary science program at a school accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service
EDUCATION or approved by the Board, with a 2.0 grade point average or higher that is
verified with a certified copy of the college transcript, if the individual has a grade point
average; OR
2. TO ASSIST A LICENSED FUNERAL DIRECTOR IN THE
PRACTICE OF FUNERAL DIRECTION, THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE ENROLLED IN OR
HAVE GRADUATED FROM A MORTUARY SCIENCE PROGRAM AT A SCHOOL
ACCREDITED BY THE AMERICAN BOARD OF FUNERAL SERVICE EDUCATION OR
APPROVED BY THE BOARD.
(ii) A licensed apprentice who was enrolled in a mortuary science
program at the time the license was granted shall remain enrolled in the program for the
duration of the apprenticeship unless the licensed apprentice graduates.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.